Missouri, session 2026, HB2541.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 9.505, to read as follows:
9.505. April fifteenth is hereby designated as "Samuel Dale Brownback
Awareness Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state, especially members of the
general assembly, are encouraged to participate in appropriate events and activities to
reflect on the well-documented fiscal and economic consequences experienced in
neighboring states following the aggressive elimination of income taxes, including
persistent budget deficits, credit downgrades, cuts to public education and
infrastructure, and subsequent bipartisan legislative action taken to reverse such
policies, in order to promote prudent and evidence-based tax policy decisions in
Missouri.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.